Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-3] State health insurance
program established. There is established within the department of health
the state health insurance program whose goals shall be to:

(1) Subsidize health care coverage for gap group
individuals, including but not necessarily limited to outpatient primary and
preventive care;

(2) Encourage the uninsured who can afford to
participate in existing health plans to seek that coverage;

(3) Discourage individuals who are already adequately
insured from seeking benefits under the state health insurance program;

(4) Assure that those persons who have the ability to
pay for all or part of their coverage be appropriately assessed by the
contractors on a sliding fee scale basis; and

(5) Ensure that the state health insurance program is
affordable to gap group individuals.

The program shall be funded by legislative
appropriations made to the department of health. [L 1989, c 378, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next